Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.570

Interfering by force or violence with any administrator, faculty member or student unlawful—Penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person, singly or in concert with others, to interfere by force or violence with any administrator, faculty member, or student of any university, college, or community or technical college who is in the peaceful discharge or conduct of his or her duties or studies.

(2) A person violating this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars, or imprisoned in jail not more than six months, or both such fine and imprisonment.

[ 2015 c 55 s 203; 2003 c 53 s 171; 1971 c 45 s 1; 1970 ex.s. c 98 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.76.600.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Severability—1971 c 45: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provisions to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 c 45 s 8.]

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 98: "If a court of competent jurisdiction shall adjudge to be invalid or unconstitutional any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this act, such judgment or decree shall not affect, impair, invalidate or nullify the remainder of this act, but the effect thereof shall be confined to the clause, sentence, paragraph, section or part of this act so adjudged to be invalid or unconstitutional." [ 1970 ex.s. c 98 s 5.]

Disturbing school, school activities or meetings—Penalty—Disposition of fines: RCW 28A.635.030.